Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-539
Annexation; when effective; board of directors; duties.

The merger shall be effective thirty days after the effective date of the ordinance annexing the territory within the rural or suburban fire protection district. If the validity of the ordinance annexing the territory is challenged by a proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction, the effective date of the merger shall be thirty days after the final determination of the validity of the ordinance. The board of directors of the district of the rural or suburban fire protection district shall continue in possession and conduct the affairs of the district until the effective date of the merger.

Laws 2018, LB130, § 7.